Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-478
Vehicle, defined.

Vehicle shall mean every device in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a highway except devices moved solely by human power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 28.